Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 609.415 is amended to read:
609.415. (1) As used in this section and ORS 609.420:
(a) “Animal” means any nonhuman mammal, bird, reptile[ ,] or  amphibian [ or fish ].
(b) “Animal rescue entity” :
(A) Means an individual or organization, including  but not limited to an animal control agency,
humane society, animal shelter, animal sanctuary  or boarding kennel not subject to ORS 167.374,
[but excluding a veterinary facility, ] that keeps, houses and maintains animals in the individual’s or
organization’s legal custody [ 10 or more animals ], whether physically located at a facility operated
by the individual or organization or kept, housed or maintained elsewhere, and that solicits  or ac-
cepts donations in any form.
(B) Does not mean a veterinary facility as defined in ORS 686.010.
[(c) “Enforcing agency” means the State Veterinarian. ]
(2) [ Any ] An  animal rescue entity shall [ comply with all of the following  record-keeping require-
ments]:
(a) Maintain a record for each animal [ that identifies: ] in the legal  custody of the animal
rescue entity, in compliance with rules adopted by the State Department of  Agriculture
pursuant to subsection (6)(a) of this section.
[(A) The date of birth for the animal or, if the date of birth  is unknown, the approximate age of
the animal;]
[(B) The date the animal rescue entity acquired possession, control or charge of  the animal and the
source of the animal; ]
[(C) The number of offspring the animal produced while in  the possession or control of the animal
rescue entity, if applicable; ]
[(D) The disposition the animal rescue  entity makes of each animal possessed by, controlled by or
in the charge of the animal rescue entity,  including the date of disposition, manner of disposition and
the name and address for  any individual or organization taking possession, control or charge of an
animal;]
[(E) The source of the animal, date  of acquisition, age, sex, breed type and weight of the animal
at intake; and ]
Enrolled House Bill 4034 (HB 4034-A) Page 1
[(F) A photograph of the animal taken within 24 hours of intake by the animal rescue entity. ]
(b) Permit an  authorized representative of the [ enforcing agency ] department to inspect records
of the  animal rescue entity required by this subsection and furnish  any reports and information re-
quired by the [ enforcing agency, as provided under ORS 609.420. ] department if the department:
(A) Conducts an on-site investigation of the premises of the animal rescue  entity pursu-
ant to ORS 609.420; or
(B) Audits the animal rescue entity pursuant to rules described in subsection (6)(b)  of
this section.
(3) An animal rescue entity  that keeps, houses and  maintains 10 or more animals in the
legal custody of the animal rescue entity for more  than two consecutive business days  shall
[comply with the following licensing requirements ]:
(a) [The entity  shall] Obtain a license issued by the [ enforcing agency ] department in accordance
with this section and [ any] rules [ or policies ] adopted by the [ enforcing agency ] department; and
(b) [ The entity shall ] Pay a reasonable fee, as determined by the [ enforcing agency ]
department, for a license  or an annual renewal of the license to provide for the actual cost of en-
forcing this section and ORS 609.420.
[(4) The enforcing  agency may not issue or renew a license under this section unless the animal
rescue entity is in compliance with this section and ORS 609.420. ]
[(5) An animal rescue entity may  transfer a license issued under this section to another person with
the written consent of the enforcing agency, provided  that the transferee otherwise qualifies to be li-
censed as an animal rescue entity under this section and rules applicable to the transferee and does
not have a  certified unpaid debt to the state. The transferee shall submit a signed release to the en-
forcing agency permitting the performance of a background investigation of the transferee,  and the en-
forcing agency shall conduct the background investigation. ]
[(6) An applicant for a license issued under this section shall demonstrate that the animal rescue
entity that is the subject of  the application complies with all standards imposed under applicable
law.]
[(7) Any animal rescue  entity is subject to inspection by the enforcing agency as provided in ORS
609.420.]
[(8)(a)] (4) A violation of this section may result in imposition  of civil penalties to be determined
by the [ enforcing agency ] department, including but not limited  to [ impoundment of all animals un-
der the animal rescue’s control, ] the denial, suspension or revocation of the animal [ rescue’s ] rescue
entity’s license [ to operate animal rescue operations ] under this section  and  a civil penalty of not
more than $500 for each violation.
[(b) Before a civil penalty may be imposed under this section, the  enforcing agency shall adopt
rules or policies that: ]
[(A) Ensure that a person who is the subject of an alleged violation receives notice  of the
allegations and potential imposition of civil penalties; ]
[(B) Allow for an opportunity for a hearing prior to the imposition of civil penalties; and ]
[(C) Allow for the opportunity for judicial review of the imposition of civil penalties. ]
[(9)] (5) Moneys [ raised] received by the [ enforcing agency under ] department pursuant to  this
section are dedicated to and shall be used for [ enforcing agency operations  undertaken pursuant to ]
implementing this section and ORS 609.420.
(6) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section, including rules that:
(a) Require an animal rescue entity  to maintain a record for each animal in the legal
custody of the animal rescue entity;
(b) Establish  a process for auditing animal rescue entities that incorporates consider-
ation of the compliance histories of the animal rescue entities;
(c) Establish licensing requirements for animal rescue entities;
(d) Ensure that an animal rescue entity that  is the subject of an alleged violation is no-
tified of the allegations and of the potential imposition of civil penalties under this section
through a notice that complies with ORS 183.415;
Enrolled House Bill 4034 (HB 4034-A) Page 2
(e) Allow an animal  rescue entity to have an opportunity for a hearing prior to the im-
position of civil penalties under this section; and
(f) Allow an  animal rescue entity to have an opportunity for judicial review of the impo-
sition of civil penalties.
(7) Consistent with the rulemaking  procedures set forth in ORS chapter 183, in develop-
ing rules to implement this section, the department shall solicit and review input from:
(a) Animal rescue entities located in rural areas of this state;
(b) Animal rescue entities located in urban areas of this state;
(c) Individuals or organizations involved in providing transportation to or from animal
rescue entities in this state; and
(d) Individuals or organizations involved in providing free or low-cost  services relating
to the care of animals in this state.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 609.420 is amended to read:
609.420. (1) Whenever an authorized representative of [ an enforcing agency ] the State Depart-
ment of Agriculture  is advised or has reason to believe that an animal rescue entity that is  re-
quired to obtain a license under ORS 609.415  is operating without  a license, the authorized
representative may visit and conduct an on-site investigation of the  premises of the animal rescue
entity. The purpose of an investigation under this section is to determine  whether the animal rescue
entity is subject to the requirements of ORS 609.415.
(2) At any reasonable  time, an authorized representative of [ an enforcing agency ] the depart-
ment, a law enforcement agency or the  United States Department of Agriculture may conduct an
on-site investigation of the premises of any  licensed animal rescue entity to determine whether the
entity is in compliance with ORS 609.415  or a rule adopted thereunder .
(3) An authorized  representative of the [ enforcing agency ] State Department of Agriculture
or a law enforcement agency shall conduct an on-site investigation of  the premises of any licensed
animal rescue entity if the  department or  agency receives a complaint about the animal rescue
entity related to the failure  to comply with the requirements of ORS 609.415  or a rule adopted
thereunder that the  department or  agency determines is credible and serious. The investigation
by the department or agency shall be limited to determining if the animal rescue entity has  failed
to comply with the requirements of ORS 609.415  or a rule adopted thereunder .
(4) Any state agency that receives a  complaint about a licensed animal rescue entity shall notify
the [ enforcing agency ] department  about the complaint and any subsequent action taken by  the
state agency based on that complaint.
[(5) A  licensed animal rescue entity shall permit an authorized representative of the enforcing
agency to inspect records of the animal rescue entity and  shall furnish any reports and information
required by the enforcing agency. ]
[(6)] (5)  If, during the course of an [ inspection] investigation made under this  section, the [ en-
forcing agency ] department finds evidence of animal cruelty in violation of  ORS 167.310 to 167.351,
167.352, 167.355 or 167.360 to 167.372, the  [ enforcing agency ] department  shall seize the evidence
and report the violation to law enforcement. Evidence of animal cruelty found through a valid [ in-
spection] investigation under this section shall be presumed admissible  in any subsequent criminal
proceeding.
Enrolled House Bill 4034 (HB 4034-A) Page 3
Passed by House February 10, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate February 25, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4034 (HB 4034-A) Page 4